apertium-rus.rus.dix
    <pardef n="пу/стить__vblex_perf">
      <e><p><l>стить</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сти</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>стите</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>стив</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>щенн</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__счастлив/ый"/></e>
      <e><p><l>стивш</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>стил</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>стила</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>стило</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>стили</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>щу</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>стим</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>стишь</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>стите</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>стит</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>стят</l><r>стить<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="гля/деть__vblex_impf">
      <e><p><l>деть</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ди</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дите</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>девш</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>дел</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дела</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дело</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дели</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дя</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дящ</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>жу</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дим</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дишь</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дите</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дит</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дят</l><r>деть<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="от/озваться__vblex_perf">
      <e><p><l>озваться</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зовись</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зовитесь</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>озвавшись</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>озвавш</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/><p><l>ся</l><r></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>озвался</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>озвалась</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>озвалось</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>озвались</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зовусь</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зовёмся</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зовё́шься</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зовё́тесь</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зовётся</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зовутся</l><r>озваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="организ/овать__vblex_dual">
      <e><p><l>овать</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уй</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уйте</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овал</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овала</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овало</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овали</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уем</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__счастлив/ый"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ующ</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ую</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уем</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уешь</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уете</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ует</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уют</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уя</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овавш</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>овав</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ованн</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__счастлив/ый"/></e>
    </pardef>
 

    <e lm="выпустить"><i>выпу</i><par n="пу/стить__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="глядеть"><i>гля</i><par n="гля/деть__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="допустить"><i>допу</i><par n="пу/стить__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="запустить"><i>запу</i><par n="пу/стить__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="опустить"><i>опу</i><par n="пу/стить__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="квалифицировать"><i>квалифицир</i><par n="организ/овать__vblex_dual"/></e>
    <e lm="механизировать"><i>механизир</i><par n="организ/овать__vblex_dual"/></e>
    <e lm="легализовать"><i>легализ</i><par n="организ/овать__vblex_dual"/></e>
    <e lm="организовать"><i>организ</i><par n="организ/овать__vblex_dual"/></e>
    <e lm="отозваться"><i>от</i><par n="от/озваться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="отпустить"><i>отпу</i><par n="пу/стить__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="приветствовать"><i>приветств</i><par n="организ/овать__vblex_dual"/></e>
    <e lm="пропустить"><i>пропу</i><par n="пу/стить__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="пустить"><i>пу</i><par n="пу/стить__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="рекомендовать"><i>рекоменд</i><par n="организ/овать__vblex_dual"/></e>
    <e lm="упустить"><i>упу</i><par n="пу/стить__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="использовать"><i>использ</i><par n="организ/овать__vblex_dual"/></e>
<e lm="возместить"><i>возме</i><par n="пу/стить__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="исследовать"><i>исслед</i><par n="организ/овать__vblex_dual"/></e>
<e lm="подпустить"><i>подпу</i><par n="пу/стить__vblex_perf"/></e>
